Utah statutes.
47-1-4.   Violation of injunction -- Proceedings for contempt.

In case of the violation of any injunction granted under the provisions of this chapter, the court, or a judge thereof, may summarily try and punish the offender.  The proceedings shall be commenced by filing with the clerk of the court an information, under oath, setting out the facts constituting the violation, upon which the court or judge shall cause a warrant to issue, under which the defendant shall be arrested.  The trial may be had upon affidavits, or either party may demand the production and oral examination of witnesses.  A party found guilty of contempt under this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.  A fine imposed shall be not less than $200 and any imprisonment in the county jail shall be not less than three nor more than six months.

